Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 147.0375, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Full and unrestricted license. new text end new text begin The board may issue a full and unrestricted license to practice medicine to a person issued a license under this section who: new text end new text begin (1) completed the terms of the person's agreement to serve as a faculty member of a medical school in Minnesota accredited by the Liaison Committee of Medical Education or an osteopathic medical school in Minnesota accredited by the American Osteopathic Association while concurrently practicing medicine as provided under a license issued under this section; new text end new text begin (2) is currently in good standing to practice medicine in this state; new text end new text begin (3) submitted a letter of recommendation in support of a full and unrestricted license containing all attestations provided under section 147.037, subdivision 1b, paragraph (i), from any physician qualified to assess the person's fitness to practice medicine under a full and unrestricted license; new text end new text begin (4) submitted a letter of recommendation in support of a full and unrestricted license from the person's current employer; new text end new text begin (5) passed steps or levels one, two, and three of the United States Medical Licensing Examination (USMLE) or the Comprehensive Osteopathic Medical Licensing Examination with passing scores as recommended by the USMLE program or National Board of Osteopathic Medical Examiners within three attempts; and new text end new text begin (6) completed 20 hours of continuing medical education. new text end